District of Columbia statutes.
2-1208.04

Freedom of information act disclosure.

All data collected and maintained as part of the reporting obligations imposed by this subchapter shall be fully subject to, and comply with, subchapter II of Chapter 5 of this title [§ 2-531 et seq.].

Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 2255, 57 DCR 6242
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2255 of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).